North Carolina, session 2025, SB353.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Development. – The Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of
Public Safety (Division), in consultation or collaboration with any other entity the Division
deems necessary to consult or collaborate with, shall develop a program to provide delinquent
juveniles committed to youth development centers with an opportunity to develop coding,
programming, and other computer-related skills to prepare them for job and career opportunities
upon their release, increase financial stability, and reduce the likelihood of recidivism. The
Division may contract with any entity it deems necessary to implement the program required
under this section. The program required under this section shall include all of the following:
(1) Specialized courses to teach coding, programming, and other
computer-related skills.
(2) Opportunities to earn industry-recognized certifications in coding,
programming, and other computer-related disciplines.
(3) Connections with mentors in the relevant fields, internship programs, and job
placement assistance to ensure a successful transition into the workforce.
SECTION 2. Implementation. – The Division shall implement the program required
by Section 1 of this act by no later than January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. Report. – By October 1, 2025, the Division shall provide a report to
the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the Fiscal Research
Division detailing its progress in developing the program required by Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 4. Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Division the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in recurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year to be used for costs associated with developing and implementing the
program required by this act.
SECTION 5. Effective Date. – Section 4 of this act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
*S353-v-1*